Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 430.220 is amended to read:
430.220. (1) The Governor shall appoint a  Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission
who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor and be responsible for the dissemination and  im-
plementation of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission’s policies and the performance  of the
commission’s duties, functions and powers.
(2) The director shall be paid a salary as provided by law or, if not so provided,  as prescribed
by the Governor.
(3) Subject to ORS chapter 240, the  director shall appoint all employees of the commission,
prescribe their duties and fix their compensation.
(4) The director has all powers necessary to effectively and expeditiously carry out  the duties,
functions and powers of the commission.
(5) The  director shall enter into agreements with [ the Oregon Health Authority, the Department
of Justice, the Department of  Human Services and other state and local ] participating state agencies
for the sharing of information as necessary to carry out the duties of the commission. The  agree-
ments shall ensure the confidentiality of all  information that is protected from disclosure by state
and federal laws.
SECTION 2.  ORS 430.221 is amended to read:
430.221. (1) As used in this section and ORS 430.220 and 430.223:
(a) “Participating  state agency” means the Department of Corrections, the Department of Hu-
man Services, the Oregon  Health Authority, the Department of Education, the Oregon Criminal
Justice  Commission,  the Oregon State Police, the Oregon Youth Authority , [or any other state agency
that is approved  by the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission to license, contract for, provide or coor-
dinate] the Department of Consumer and Business Services, the  Housing and Community
Services Department, the Youth Development Division, the Higher Education  Coordinating
Commission, the Oregon  State Lottery Commission, the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Com-
mission, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs or any state agency that administers or funds
alcohol or drug abuse prevention or treatment services.
Enrolled House Bill 4098 (HB 4098-B) Page 1
(b) “Provider” means any person that is licensed by the Oregon Health Authority to provide
alcohol or drug abuse prevention or treatment services.
(2) There is created the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, which is  charged with improving
the effectiveness  and efficiency of state and local alcohol and drug abuse prevention and treatment
services.
(3) The membership of the commission consists of:
(a) No more than 17 members  appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate
in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565 and appointed, as the Governor  deems practi-
cable, to ensure representation from stakeholders directly impacted by the work of the  commission,
as follows:
(A) At least 75 percent of the members appointed by  the Governor must be representatives of
the following public health and health care stakeholder groups:
(i) County commissioners, managers and administrators;
(ii) Indian tribes;
(iii) The following providers of addiction prevention and recovery services:
(I) Treatment providers employed by an outpatient addiction treatment program;
(II) Directors of inpatient addiction treatment centers;
(III) Addiction treatment providers who are culturally  competent to serve specific cultural or
ethnic populations;
(IV) Certified prevention specialists;
(V) Certified addiction counselors; and
(VI) Certified addiction recovery mentors;
(iv) Alcohol or drug treatment researchers or epidemiologists;
(v) The health insurance industry or hospitals;
(vi) Consumers of addiction recovery services who are in recovery and the  family members of
consumers;
(vii) Experts in addiction medicine;
(viii) Entities that provide housing to individuals who are in recovery; and
(ix) Social service providers.
(B) Up to 25 percent of the members appointed by the Governor shall  be representatives of one
or more of the following stakeholder groups:
(i) District attorneys.
(ii) County sheriffs.
(iii) Chiefs of police.
(iv) Criminal defense attorneys.
(v) County community corrections agencies.
(b) Two members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the commission as nonvoting mem-
bers of the commission, acting in an advisory capacity only and including:
(A) One  member from among members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate;
and
(B) One member from among members of the  House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker
of the House of Representatives.
(c) A judge of a circuit court appointed to the commission as a nonvoting member by the Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court.
(d) The director of the behavioral health program of the Oregon Health  Authority as a nonvot-
ing member.
(e) A representative of a  coordinated care organization appointed to the commission as a non-
voting member by the Governor.
(4) The  Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission shall select one of its members as chairperson and
another as vice chairperson, for such terms and  with duties and powers necessary for the perform-
ance of the functions of such offices as the commission determines.
Enrolled House Bill 4098 (HB 4098-B) Page 2
(5)(a) A majority of the voting  members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(b) If a member of the commission is  absent for more than two consecutive scheduled meetings
of the commission, the Director of the Alcohol  and Drug Policy Commission appointed under ORS
430.220 may recommend to the Governor that the member be replaced.
(6) Official action of the commission requires the approval of a majority of a quorum.
(7) The commission may establish a steering committee  and subcommittees. These committees
may be continuing or temporary. A person  who is not a member of the commission may be appointed
by the commission to  serve on a subcommittee. The commission shall appoint subcommittee members
to ensure representation from all stakeholders directly impacted by the work of the commission.
(8) The term of office of each commission member appointed by the Governor is four years, but
a member serves at the pleasure  of the Governor. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor
shall make an appointment to become immediately effective.
(9) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the commission. Subject  to
available funding, the commission may contract with a public or private entity to provide  staff
support.
(10) Members of the commission who are not members  of the Legislative Assembly are entitled
to compensation and expenses incurred by them in the  performance of their official duties in the
manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495. Claims for compensation and expenses shall be
paid out of  funds appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority or funds appropriated to the com-
mission for purposes of the commission.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 430.223 is amended to read:
430.223. (1)  For purposes of this section, “program” means a state, local or tribal alcohol and
drug abuse prevention and treatment program.
(2) The Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission established under ORS 430.221 shall develop a
comprehensive  addiction,  prevention, treatment and recovery plan for this state. The plan must in-
clude, but is not limited to, recommendations regarding:
(a) Capacity, type and utilization of programs;
(b) Methods to assess the effectiveness and performance of programs;
(c) The best use of existing programs;
(d) Budget policy priorities for participating state agencies;
(e) Standards for licensing programs;
(f) Minimum standards for contracting for, providing and coordinating alcohol and drug  abuse
prevention and treatment services  among programs that use federal, private or state funds admin-
istered by the state; and
(g) The most effective  and efficient use of participating state agency resources to support pro-
grams.
(3) All participating state agencies shall:
(a) Meet with the commission on a quarterly basis to review and report on each  agency’s
progress on implementing the plan; and
(b) Report to the  commission, in the manner prescribed by the commission, each
agency’s process and outcome measures established under the plan.
[(3)] (4) The commission shall review and update the plan [ developed under  subsection (2) of this
section] no later than July 1  of each even-numbered year and shall produce and publish a report
on the metrics and other indicators of progress in achieving the goals of the plan .
[(4)] (5) The commission may:
(a) Conduct studies related to the duties of the commission in collaboration with  other state
agencies;
(b) Apply for and receive gifts and grants for public and private sources; and
(c) Use funds received by the commission to carry out the purposes of ORS  430.220 and 430.221
and this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4098 (HB 4098-B) Page 3
[(5)] (6)  All participating state agencies and local agencies shall assist the commission in de-
veloping the comprehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan.
[(6)] (7) The commission may adopt rules to carry out its duties under this section.
SECTION 4. As used in sections 4 to 6 of this 2022 Act:
(1) “Distributor  Settlement Agreement” means the settlement agreement between the
State of Oregon and participating  subdivisions and McKesson, Cardinal and
AmerisourceBergen dated as of July 21, 2021, and any revision thereto.
(2) “Janssen Settlement Agreement”  means the settlement agreement between the State
of Oregon and participating subdivisions and Johnson & Johnson, Janssen  Pharmaceuticals,
Incorporated, and Ortho-McNeil-Janssen Pharmaceuticals, Incorporated, dated as  of July 21,
2021, and any revision thereto.
(3) “Participating subdivisions” means cities and counties  in this state with populations
of at least 10,000 residents.
SECTION 5. (1) The Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment and Recovery Fund is es-
tablished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund, consisting  of
moneys, other than attorney fees and costs, paid to the state pursuant to:
(a) The Distributor Settlement Agreement;
(b) The Janssen Settlement Agreement; and
(c) Judgments or settlements identified by the Attorney  General as arising from the li-
ability of  distributors of opioids, manufacturers of opioids, pharmacies for the selling of
opioids or the consultants, agents or  associates of distributors, manufacturers or pharma-
cies.
(2) Moneys in the Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment and Recovery Fund  are con-
tinuously appropriated to the Oregon  Health Authority for the purpose of administering the
Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment and Recovery  Board and for the allocation of
moneys as directed by the board in accordance with section 6 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment and Recovery Board is
created in the Oregon Health Authority for the purpose of determining the allocation of
funding from the Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment and  Recovery Fund established
in section 5 of this 2022 Act. The board consists of:
(a) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(A) A policy advisor to the Governor;
(B) A representative of the Department of Justice;
(C) A representative of the Oregon Health Authority; and
(D) A representative of the Department of Human Services;
(b) The Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission or the director’s designee;
(c) The chairperson of the Oversight and Accountability Council  established in ORS
430.388 or the chairperson’s designee;
(d) The following members appointed by  the Governor from a list of candidates provided
by the Association of Oregon Counties and the League of Oregon Cities or the  successor
organizations to the Association of Oregon Counties and the League of Oregon Cities:
(A) An individual representing Clackamas, Washington or Multnomah County;
(B) An individual representing Clatsop, Columbia, Coos, Curry, Jackson, Josephine,  Lane
or Yamhill County;
(C) An individual representing the City of Portland;
(D) An individual representing a city with a population above 10,000 residents  as of July
21, 2021;
(E) An individual representing a city with a population at or below 10,000 residents as of
July 21, 2021; and
(F) A representative of the Oregon Coalition of Local Health Officials or its  successor
organization;
Enrolled House Bill 4098 (HB 4098-B) Page 4
(e) The following members appointed by the  Governor from a list of candidates provided
by the members described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection:
(A) A representative of a community mental health program;
(B) An individual who has experienced a substance use disorder or a  representative of
an organization that advocates on behalf of individuals with substance use disorders; and
(C) An individual representing law enforcement,  first responders or jail commanders or
wardens;
(f) A member of the House  of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, who shall be a nonvoting member of the board;
(g) A member of the Senate appointed by the President of  the Senate, who shall be a
nonvoting member of the board; and
(h) The State Court Administrator  or the administrator’s designee, who shall be a non-
voting member of the board.
(2) The Governor shall select from the members described  in subsections (1)(a), (b) and
(c) of this section  one cochairperson to represent state entities, and the members described
in subsection (1)(d) of this section shall select from one of their  members a cochairperson
to represent cities or counties.
(3) The term  of each member of the board who is not an ex officio member is four years,
but a member serves at the pleasure  of the appointing authority. Before the expiration of a
member’s term, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor whose term begins on
January 1 next following. A  member is eligible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy for
any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appointment to become immediately ef-
fective for the unexpired term.
(4) Decision-making by the board shall be based on consensus and supported by at  least
a majority of the members. The board shall document all objections to board decisions.
(5) The board shall conduct at least four public  meetings in accordance with ORS 192.610
to 192.690, which shall be publicized to facilitate attendance at the meetings and during which
the board shall receive testimony and input from  the community. The board shall also es-
tablish a process for the public to  provide written comments and proposals at each meeting
of the board.
(6) In determining the allocation of moneys from the Opioid Settlement  Prevention,
Treatment and Recovery Fund:
(a) No more than five percent of the moneys may be spent on administering the board
and the fund.
(b) A portion of the moneys shall be allocated toward  a unified and evidence-based state
system for collecting, analyzing and publishing data about  the availability and efficacy of
substance use prevention, treatment and recovery services statewide.
(c) Moneys remaining after allocations in accordance with paragraphs (a)  and (b) of this
subsection shall be allocated for funding statewide and regional programs identified in  the
Distributor Settlement Agreement, the  Janssen Settlement Agreement and any other judg-
ment or settlement described in section 5 (1)(c) of  this 2022 Act, including but not limited
to:
(A) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to treat opioid  use
disorders and any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health conditions;
(B) Programs that use evidence-based  or evidence-informed strategies to support indi-
viduals in recovery from  opioid use disorders and any co-occurring substance use disorders
or mental health conditions;
(C) Programs that use evidence-based  or evidence-informed strategies to provide con-
nections to care for individuals who have or are at  risk of developing opioid use disorders
and any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health conditions;
(D) Programs that use evidence-based or  evidence-informed strategies to address the
needs of  individuals with opioid use disorders and any co-occurring substance use disorders
Enrolled House Bill 4098 (HB 4098-B) Page 5
or mental health conditions and who are involved in,  at risk of becoming involved in, or in
transition from, the criminal justice system;
(E) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed  strategies to address the
needs of pregnant or parenting women with  opioid use disorders and any co-occurring sub-
stance use disorders or mental health conditions,  and the needs of their families, including
babies with neonatal abstinence syndrome;
(F) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies  to support efforts
to prevent over-prescribing of opioids and ensure appropriate prescribing and dispensing  of
opioids;
(G) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to support efforts
to discourage or prevent misuse of opioids;
(H) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to support efforts
to prevent or reduce overdose deaths or other opioid-related harms;
(I) Programs to educate law enforcement or other first responders regarding appropriate
practices and precautions when dealing with users of fentanyl or other opioids;
(J) Programs to provide wellness and  support services for first responders and others
who experience secondary trauma associated with opioid-related emergency events;
(K) Programs to support efforts to provide leadership, planning, coordination, facilitation,
training and technical assistance to abate the opioid epidemic through activities, programs
or strategies; or
(L) Funding to support opioid abatement research.
(d) The board shall be guided and informed by:
(A) The comprehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan developed by
the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission in accordance with ORS 430.223;
(B) The board’s ongoing evaluation of the efficacy of the funding allocations;
(C) Evidence-based and evidence-informed strategies and best practices;
(D) Input the board receives from the public;
(E) Equity considerations for underserved populations; and
(F) The terms of the settlement agreements.
(7) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the board.
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding the term of office specified by  section 6 of this 2022 Act,
of the  members first appointed by the Governor to the Opioid Settlement Prevention,
Treatment and Recovery Board:
(1) Four shall serve for terms ending January 2, 2024;
(2) Four shall serve for terms ending January 2, 2025; and
(3) Five shall serve for terms ending January 2, 2026.
SECTION 8.
Sections 4 to 7 of this 2022 Act are repealed on January 2, 2040.
SECTION 9.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $625,733
is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
receipts, marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected
or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for carrying out section 6 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 10.  This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4098 (HB 4098-B) Page 6
Passed by House March 2, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4098 (HB 4098-B) Page 7